District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.53

Release of existing debt.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30cc
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-287, § 101(c), 54 DCR 969
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689